District of Columbia statutes.
48-841.04

Penalties.

Failure to comply with this chapter may be used by a health-occupation board as a factor when determining licensure status for a prescriber; provided, that a prescriber shall not be subject to an adverse licensure action if the Board of Medicine determines that the prescribing, administering, or furnishing of the prescription medication for the off-label use was clearly evidence-based and the common practice within the medical community.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 204, 55 DCR 1659